Rhode Island, session 2025, SB267.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 27-18.2-3 of the General Laws in Chapter 27-18.2 entitled "Medicare
Supplement Insurance Policies" is hereby amended to read as follows:
27-18.2-3. Standards for policy provisions.
(a) No Medicare supplement insurance policy or certificate in force in the state shall contain
benefits that duplicate benefits provided by Medicare.
(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law of this state, a Medicare supplement policy
or certificate shall not exclude or limit benefits for loss incurred more than six (6) months from the
effective date of coverage because it involved a preexisting condition. The policy or certificate shall
not define a preexisting condition more restrictively than a condition for which medical advice was
given or treatment was recommended by or received from a physician within six (6) months before
the effective date of coverage.
(c) The commissioner shall adopt reasonable regulations to establish specific standards for
policy provisions of Medicare supplement policies and certificates. Those standards shall be in
addition to and in accordance with the applicable laws of this state, including but not limited to §§
27-18-3(a) and 42-62-12 and regulations promulgated pursuant to those sections. No requirement
of this title or chapter 62 of title 42 relating to minimum required policy benefits, other than the
minimum standards contained in this chapter, shall apply to Medicare supplement policies and
certificates. The standards may cover, but not be limited to:
(1) Terms of renewability;

(2) Initial and subsequent conditions of eligibility;
(3) Nonduplication of coverage;
(4) Probationary periods;
(5) Benefit limitations, exceptions, and reductions;
(6) Elimination periods;
(7) Requirements for replacement;
(8) Recurrent conditions; and
(9) Definitions of terms.
(d) The commissioner may adopt reasonable regulations that specify prohibited policy
provisions not specifically authorized by statute, if, in the opinion of the commissioner, those
provisions are unjust, unfair, or unfairly discriminatory to any person insured or proposed to be
insured under a Medicare supplement policy or certificate.
(e) The commissioner shall adopt reasonable regulations to establish minimum standards
for premium rates, benefits, claims payment, marketing practices, and compensation arrangements
and reporting practices for Medicare supplement policies and certificates.
(f) The commissioner may adopt any reasonable regulations necessary to conform
Medicare supplement policies and certificates to the requirements of federal law and regulations
promulgated pursuant to federal law, including but not limited to:
(1) Requiring refunds or credits if the policies or certificates do not meet loss ratio
requirements;
(2) Establishing a uniform methodology for calculating and reporting loss ratios;
(3) Assuring public access to policies, premiums, and loss ratio information of issuers of
Medicare supplement insurance;
(4) Establishing a process for approving or disapproving policy forms and certificate forms
and proposed premium increases;
(5) Establishing a policy for holding public hearings prior to approval of premium increases
that may include the applicant’s provision of notice of the proposed premium increase to all
subscribers subject to the proposed increase, at least ten (10) days prior to the hearing; and
(6) Establishing standards for Medicare select policies and certificates.
(g) Each Medicare supplement Plan A policy or applicable certificate that an issuer
currently, or at any time hereafter, makes available in this state shall be made available to any
applicant under the age of sixty-five (65) who is eligible for Medicare due to a disability or end-
stage renal disease, provided that the applicant submits their application during the first six (6)
months immediately following the applicant’s initial eligibility for Medicare Part B, or alternate
LC000513 - Page 2 of 4

enrollment period as determined by the commissioner. The issuance or coverage of any Medicare
supplement policy pursuant to this section shall not be conditioned on the medical or health status
or receipt of health care by the applicant; and no insurer shall perform individual medical
underwriting on any applicant in connection with the issuance of a policy pursuant to this
subsection.
Rhode Island residents eligible for Medicare due to age sixty-five (65) years or older or
due to disability or end-stage renal disease if under age sixty-five (65) years are entitled to
continuous enrollment rights for Medicare supplement ("Medigap") policies. Insurers are
prohibited from using medical underwriting or any other method to deny Medigap coverage to
eligible individuals who are applying under the provisions of this chapter. Premium rates for
Medicare supplement policies shall be determined on a community-rated basis.
(h) Individuals enrolled in Medicare Parts A and B applying for a Medicare supplement
plan, regardless of age, shall receive guaranteed issue rights for standardized Medicare Supplement
Plan A during an annual enrollment period of at least one month each calendar year, as established
by the issuer. The issuance or coverage of any Medicare supplement policy pursuant to this section
shall not be conditioned on the medical or health status or receipt of health care by the applicant;
and no insurer shall perform individual medical underwriting in connection with the issuance of a
policy pursuant to this subsection; provided:
(1) That the applicant, having been enrolled in Medicare Part A and Part B, enrolled in a
Medicare Advantage plan under Medicare Part C, and remains enrolled in such a plan when the
Medicare supplement application is submitted.
The office of the health insurance commissioner ("OHIC") shall conduct an annual review
of premium rates for Medicare supplement policies pursuant to §27-18.2-3(d).
(i) OHIC shall monitor compliance with the provisions of this chapter and may impose
administrative penalties on insurers for violations, including, but not limited to fines, suspension
of policy offerings, or corrective action orders. Nothing in this title 27 ("insurance") shall limit the
actions that may be taken by the Rhode Island attorney general under any state or federal laws.
(j) If any provision of this section or the application to any person or circumstance, is held
to be invalid, the remaining provisions of this section shall not be affected. The invalidity of any
part of this section shall not affect the validity of the remaining provisions.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect on January 1, 2026
========
LC000513
========
LC000513 - Page 3 of 4